California statutes. Education Code
(d) “School building,” as used in this section, means any building designed and constructed to be used for elementary or secondary school purposes by a school district.

(e) The requirements of Sections 17213, 17213.1 and 17213.2 shall not apply to a schoolsite if the acquisition occurred prior to January 1, 2000, to the extent a school district is subject to the requirements set forth in those sections pursuant to a judicial order or an order issued by, or an agreement with the Department of Toxic Substances Control regarding that site, and the school district is in full compliance with that order or agreement.

(f) For purposes of this section, the acceptance of construction bids shall constitute approval of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 992, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Approvals [17280. - 17317.]

17280.

(a) (1) The Department of General Services under the police power of the state shall supervise the design and construction of any school building or the reconstruction or alteration of or addition to any school building, if not exempted under Section 17295, to ensure that plans and specifications comply with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article and building standards published in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, and to ensure that the work of construction has been performed in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, for the protection of life and property. Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow a school district to perform work with its own forces in excess of the limitations set forth in Sections 17595 and 17599. In calculating the cost of any project of reconstruction or alteration of, or addition to, any school building for the purpose of determining the applicability of the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article and building standards published in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, the Department of General Services shall not include, as an element of that cost, any expenses of air-conditioning equipment or insulation materials for that building, or of installing the equipment or materials.

(2) In the alternative, for a leased or purchased building, a school district may comply with this section by complying with Section 17280.5.

(b) Whenever repairs due to fire damage, not including any damage caused by wind or earthquake, must be made to any school building previously approved by the Department of General Services, the approved plans and specifications used in the original work under then existing rules, regulations, and building standards may be used without modification, providing all other provisions of this article are carried out.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no school district shall be authorized to construct or reconstruct any school building, regardless of the source of funding, unless and until the governing board of the district, by resolution, has indicated the agreement of the district that any school building construction or reconstruction that exceeds those construction costs and allowable area standards or any allowable building area computed for an attendance area pursuant to Section 17041 shall, in the event of the district’s subsequent application for state funding for school facility construction, be deducted from the allowable building area for which the district would otherwise have been eligible, which restriction shall not be subject to waiver or exception as otherwise may be provided by law.

(d) If it is determined that, for any reason, a school district failed to comply with the requirement of this section, the district shall not be eligible for any additional building area pursuant to Section 17049 and may be denied any time priority established for the particular project pursuant to Section 17016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 28.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17280.1.

Written rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article to clarify the application of the California Building Standards Code shall be made available to the public by the State Architect upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 642, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17280.5.

(a) The Seismic Safety Commission shall convene an advisory committee that shall include, but not be limited to, the State Architect, the State Fire Marshall, representatives from the major professional associations representing architects, engineers, and school facilities designers, and other interested parties.

(b) The advisory committee shall convene by August 19, 2002, and shall study and report on whether a regulatory process may be developed that will allow the State Architect to determine whether a building not originally constructed in compliance with the Field Act, as defined in Section 17281, and its implementing regulations either meets, or can be retrofitted to meet, the equivalent pupil safety performance standard as a building constructed according to the Field Act and its implementing regulations. If the advisory committee finds that the regulatory process may be developed, the advisory committee, shall include within its report the facts and rationale supporting the finding and the essential steps required in that regulatory process. The advisory committee shall report its findings to the Seismic Safety Commission by December 31, 2002.

(c) By January 8, 2003, and after reviewing the advisory committee’s findings, the Seismic Safety Commission shall make a determination as to whether the regulatory process described in subdivision (b) may be developed, and shall report that determination to the Governor and the Legislature.

(d) If the Seismic Safety Commission determines that the regulatory process may be developed, the State Architect shall draft regulations to establish that regulatory process and to delineate the required retrofitting, deconstructive testing, continuous inspection procedures, and other necessary certifications and requirements that must be completed for a building to ensure it meets the equivalent pupil safety performance standard as a building constructed according to the Field Act and its implementing regulations. The State Architect shall promulgate the regulations on or before April 1, 2003, as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) Notwithstanding any law, a leased or purchased building that is determined to have the equivalent pupil safety performance standard as a building constructed according to the Field Act and implementing regulations is hereby deemed to be in full compliance with the safety requirements of a school building as set forth in Section 17280, and is hereby deemed to be in full compliance with the Field Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 33, Sec. 29.   Effective April 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

17281.

This article, together with Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365), and Article 7 (commencing with Section 81130) of Chapter 1 of Part 49, shall be known and may be cited as the “Field Act.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17282.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to expedite the repair, alteration, and reconstruction of school facilities that have been damaged or destroyed by fire, earthquake, flood, or other manmade or natural disasters, to return those school facilities to a condition that makes them useful to school districts in the least amount of time and at the lowest appropriate cost while maintaining the integrity and safety of the structure as required by the laws of this state.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a school facility has been damaged or destroyed by fire, earthquake, flood, or other manmade or natural disaster, all reviews or approvals required by this article shall be expedited. In no event shall any review or approval exceed 60 days, excluding weekends and holidays, from the date of receipt of all complete plans, specifications, and documentation for the facilities from the district.

(c) If, upon review, the plans or specifications require minor amendment or modification, these minor amendments or modifications shall not delay the completion of the review or approval beyond the 60-day requirement specified in subdivision (b) unless the amendment or modification constitutes a major substantive change affecting the entire project. While any minor amendments or modifications are being undertaken, the remainder of the project shall continue under review so that a timely and adequate review may be completed within the 60-day requirement of subdivision (b).

(d) A state agency that is required to perform any review or approval under this article may hire additional personnel or incur any additional costs necessary to perform the review or approval within the time limits set forth in this section and shall charge the district a fee not to exceed the actual cost of the review or approval.

(e) As used in this section, “damaged” means damages to the extent that occupancy is precluded based upon a report of an architect or a structural engineer and the concurrence of the Department of General Services in the report’s conclusion that the occupancy of the premises is precluded.

(f) The expedited review and approval required by this section shall not apply if the documents are not submitted within six months of the damage to, or destruction of, the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17282.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2010, the Division of the State Architect within the Department of General Services shall develop uniform criteria for precheck approval processes for solar design plans, including structural plans and calculations, for a school facility that comply with rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article and building standards published in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations. The criteria shall include provisions to ensure fire and life safety.

(b) The Department of General Services shall complete the review of a solar design plan application submitted by a school district that conforms with the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (a) within 45 calendar days of the receipt
 of a complete application. If the Department of General Services requests an applicant to submit a corrected application, the Department of General Services shall act on the corrected application within 10 calendar days of the date the applicant submits the corrected complete application to that department for approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 48.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17283.

“School building” as used in this article means and includes any building used, or designed to be used, for elementary or secondary school purposes and constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to, by the state or by any city or city and county, or by any political subdivision, or by any school district of any kind within the state, or by any regional occupational center or program created by or authorized to act by an agreement under joint exercise of power, or by the United States government, or any agency thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17283.5.

(a) For the purposes of this article, Article 5 (commencing with Section 17350), and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365), “school building” does not include any building used or intended to be used by a school district as residential housing.

(b) As used in this section, “residential housing” means any building used as a personal residence by a teacher or employee of a school district, with the teacher’s or employee’s family, if
 applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   (AB 306)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17284.

Any school building, as defined in Section 17283, operated by a county official, board, or commission which on the effective date of this section is in violation of this article, if compliance therewith was otherwise required, may be continued in use as a school building after June 30, 1975, provided that no building shall be operated after that date unless the county official, board, or commission requests and obtains from the State Allocation Board authority for use of the building for a specific period after that date.

Concurrent with the request the county official, board, or commission shall file with the State Allocation Board a statement or resolution declaring an intention to utilize the building as a school building after June 30, 1975, pending its repair, reconstruction, or replacement.

The State Allocation Board shall not authorize the county official, board, or commission to use the building after June 30, 1975, unless it has first determined that the affected authority has already proceeded with a plan of total repair, reconstruction, or replacement in a timely manner and the contract has been let for any phase of, and work commenced on, the project.

In no event shall the State Allocation Board authorize the use of these unsafe facilities for a period extending beyond the completion of the replacement facilities or beyond June 30, 1977, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17284.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any waiver granted by the State Allocation Board to a school district for use of a nonconforming existing private building acquired for conversion for use as a school building, that had not expired prior to January 1, 2000, is hereby extended until January 1, 2002, if the work to make the building a conforming structure commenced prior to January 1, 2001, but had not been completed by that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 202, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17285.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law except Sections 17286, 17287, 17405, and this section, a leased building that does not meet the requirements of Section 17280 may not be used as a school building, as defined in Section 17283, after September 1, 1990.

(b) A school district may lease a commercial building prior to January 1, 2003, that does not meet the requirements of Section 17280, for use as a school building, as defined in Section 17283, if the governing board of the district finds that all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The building was constructed in accordance with seismic safety standards
 for commercial buildings constructed within an earthquake zone.

(2) The building permit for the initial construction of the building was issued on or after January 1, 1990.

(3) A structural engineer has inspected the building and submitted a report to the governing board of the school district that certifies that the building is in substantial compliance with the requirements of the Field Act. This certification requirement is satisfied if the structural engineer affixes his or her seal of approval to the report and he or she attests in that report that to the best of his or her knowledge:

(A) He or she has reviewed the design calculations, construction documents, and the local government construction inspection records of the building to the extent available.

(B) He or she has authorized testing and has observed or reviewed the test results and the inspections of an adequate sample of the structure’s welds, anchor bolts, and other structural elements.

(C) He or she has observed that the overhead nonstructural elements, including, but not limited to, light fixtures, heating, and air-conditioning diffusers are adequately braced or anchored.

The governing board of the school district shall submit the report to the Division of the State Architect for its review. The Division of the State Architect has one month to review the report for compliance with the above requirements, and to provide feedback to the structural engineer regarding any insufficiencies with the report, and whether or not the building is in substantial compliance with the requirements of the Field Act. If the Division of the State
 Architect does not respond within one month of the final and complete report being submitted, the Division of the State Architect will be deemed to have concurred with the structural engineer’s report. A final decision by the governing board of the school district to occupy the building for school purposes shall not occur until the governing board has reviewed and considered the feedback of the Division of the State Architect, or the one month review period has passed.

No member of the governing board of a school district, nor any employee of a school district, shall be held personally liable for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that the governing board of the school district used a commercial building pursuant to this subdivision for a school and the building was not constructed under the requirements of Section 17280. This exemption from personal liability for members of the governing board and employees of a school district is not
 intended to limit the liability of the school district for injury to persons or damage to property resulting from the fact that the governing board or any employee of the school district used a commercial building pursuant to this subdivision for a school and the building was not constructed under the requirements of Section 17280. This exemption from personal liability for members of the governing board and employees of a school district is not intended to limit the liability of the school district, the governing board or the district’s employees pursuant to Section 835 of the Government Code. Section 17312 is not applicable to a person who, pursuant to this section, leases or uses a building for a school building that meets the requirements of this section but does not meet the requirements of Section 17280. Approval and use of a building pursuant this subdivision does not constitute a violation of the Field Act.

(c) A building leased
 pursuant to Section 17280 may be used after September 1, 1991, as a regional occupational center or program that does not meet the requirements of Section 17280, provided the building satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) The facility is one of the following:

(A) A single-story, wood-framed structure.

(B) A single-story, light steel frame structure.

(C) A structure for which a structural engineer has submitted a report that certifies that substantial structural hazards do not exist, as to that structure. The governing board of the regional occupational center or program, as provided for under Section 52310.5, shall review the report prior to approval of the lease and may reject the report if there is any evidence of fraud regarding the facts in
 the report.

(2) The building or structure complies with all applicable local building standards and all applicable local health and safety standards in the community in which it is located.

(3) The governing board of the regional occupational center or program, as provided for under Section 52310.5, certifies to the State Allocation Board that reasonable efforts have been made to locate the regional occupational center or program in facilities that conform to the seismic safety standards set forth in Part 2 (commencing with Section 2-101), Part 3 (commencing with Section 3-089-1), Part 4 (commencing with Section 4-403), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 5-102), of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 23.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17286.

Where the primary use of either a building or complex within which the building is situated, operated by an official or board of a city, city and county or county, is for purposes other than educational, such as, but not limited to, correctional, forestry, or hospital purposes, the building shall not be considered to be a “school building” within the meaning of Section 17283 notwithstanding any educational use thereof incidental to the primary purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17287.

For the purposes of this article and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365), “school building” does not include (a) any building of a school district or county superintendent of schools which is used solely for classes or programs in outdoor science, conservation, and forestry in accordance with Article 5 (commencing with Section 8760) of Chapter 4 of Part 6 and which does not occupy, in whole or in part, the same parcel of land upon which there is situated any school maintained by the district or county superintendent, or (b) agricultural education laboratory facilities used primarily for plant and animal production or the storage of materials, equipment, and supplies involved in this production.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17288.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 17285, any high school pupil who attends a class or classes on a campus of the University of California or the California State University in order to receive specialized educational services and opportunities authorized by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 58800) of Part 31 and any adult attending a special education program established pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000), is considered a pupil of that campus for the purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5. Any building or structure or portion of building or structure that pupils occupy pursuant to this section shall not be considered “school buildings” within the meaning of Section 17283.

(b) The governing board of each school district, each county board of education, or each county superintendent of schools, as appropriate, shall notify, in writing, the parent or guardian of each high school pupil who attends a class or classes authorized by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 58800) of Part 31 and each adult attending a special education program established pursuant to Part 30 (commencing with Section 56000), prior to the pupil’s attendance at the class on a university campus that, although University of California and California State University buildings are required to conform to the rigorous standards of the Uniform Building Code (UBC), the buildings on the university campuses may not meet the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5. This notice shall accompany, to the greatest extent possible, any existing notification to parents or guardians regarding specialized educational services and opportunities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17289.

In order to provide alternative, community-based educational opportunities through independent study, any school district or county office of education may request an exemption from the State Allocation Board for a building or structure, or portion of a building or structure, from the definition of “school buildings” within the meaning of Section 17283. The exemptions may be granted for no longer than two years and exemptions are renewable. An exemption may only be granted if the school district or county office of education demonstrates to the satisfaction of the State Allocation Board all of the following:

(a) The building or structure, or portion of building or structure, satisfies all of the following:

(1) It is not located on a regular schoolsite.

(2) It complies with all applicable local building standards and all relevant local health and safety standards in the community in which it is located.

(3) It is used for independent study.

(4) It serves fewer than 25 pupils enrolled in kindergarten or any of the grades 1 to 12, inclusive, at any one time in the building or structure, or in a portion of a building or structure where the remainder of the building or structure is not used for instructional purposes.

(b) The use of the building or structure is critical to providing an effective alternative, community-based program.

(c) The use of other buildings or structures that would meet seismic safety standards for school facilities is not practical.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17291.

(a) An owned relocatable building or structure that is to be used for school purposes shall be subject to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365).

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become operative on September 30, 1997.

(History: Amended (as to be added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277) by Stats. 1997, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   Effective August 18, 1997.   As amended, this section initially became operative on September 30, 1997, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 320 (and by its own provisions).)
-------------------------------------------

17292.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law, an owned or leased relocatable building that does not meet the requirements of Section 17280 may be used until September 30, 2015, as a school building, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The relocatable building was manufactured and was in use for classroom purposes on or before May 1, 2000, and bears a commercial coach insignia of approval from the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(2) The relocatable building is a single story structure with not more than 2,160 square feet of interior floor area when all sections are joined together.

(3) The relocatable building was constructed after December 19, 1979, and bears a commercial coach insignia of approval from the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(4) The bracing and anchoring of interior overhead nonstructural elements, such as light fixtures and heating and air-conditioning diffusers, and the foundation system complies with the applicable rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article and published in Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) The building construction, including associated site construction, except for the relocatable building defined in paragraph (2), complies with the applicable rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article, Sections 4450 to 4458, inclusive, of the Government Code, and Section 13143 of the Health and Safety Code and the administrative and building standards published in Title 19 and Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(6) The relocatable building is anchored to the ground to resist earthquake and wind loads.

(7) The school district has certified to the Department of General Services that the relocatable building complies with the requirements of this subdivision.

(8) The Department of General Services has issued a certification of compliance with the requirements of this article.

(b) The Department of General Services may assess fees to carry out the requirements of this section. Fees imposed pursuant to this subdivision shall be equal to the costs associated with making the certifications and inspections required by, and otherwise enforcing, this section and shall be deposited in the Public School Planning, Design, and Construction Review Revolving Fund.

(c) For each relocatable building that was used as a school building pursuant to this section, the governing board of the school district shall adopt a resolution by October 30, 2015, certifying to the State Allocation Board that commencing September 30, 2015, the relocatable building is no longer being used as a school building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 308, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17292.5.

(a) If the governing board of a school district operates a program for expelled pupils, the governing board shall do one or more of the following:

(1) Utilize available school facilities that conform to the requirements of Part 2 (commencing with Section 2-101), Part 3 (commencing with Section 3-089-1), Part 4 (commencing with Section 4-403), and Part 5 (commencing with Section 5-102), of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Apply for emergency portable classrooms pursuant to Chapter 25 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10.

(3) Enter
 into lease agreements for facilities, provided that the facilities are limited to a structure where a structural engineer has submitted a report that determines substantial structural hazards do not exist.

(b) Before entering into any lease pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the governing board of the school district shall certify to the State Allocation Board that all reasonable efforts have been made to locate the program in facilities that conform to the structural safety standards listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 24.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

17293.

(a) On or after January 1, 1993, if a county superintendent or school district elects to operate a new or expanded pregnant and parenting teen program pursuant to Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 54740) of Chapter 9 of Part 29, the county superintendent or school district may enter into lease agreements for school facilities as set forth in subdivision (b), if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) All available school facilities conform to the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17320).

(2) If facilities meeting the requirements of paragraph (1) are not available, the school district or county superintendent of schools has applied to lease or purchase emergency portable classrooms pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 17085) of Part 10 and the application was either not approved or the portable classrooms approved will not meet the needs of the county superintendent of schools or the school district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the county superintendent or the school district may enter into lease agreements as follows:

(1) A report and certification of safety shall be prepared by a structural engineer that verifies that the building meets local safety standards and that substantial structural hazards do not exist. The county board of education or school district governing board, as the case may be, shall review the report and certification prior to the approval of the lease and may reject the report if there is evidence of fraud regarding the facts in the report. In addition, the county board of education or the governing board of the school district shall cause to be prepared and maintained on file a report and certification of safety by a structural engineer every five years from the date of the initial lease as long as the building continues to be used and a statement that the building continues to meet local safety standards and that structural hazards do not exist.

(2) Before entering into any lease, the county superintendent or the school district shall certify that all reasonable efforts have been made to locate programs in facilities that conform to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1078, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Became operative on July 1, 2000, pursuant to Sec. 13 of Ch. 1078.)
-------------------------------------------

17294.

“Construction or alteration” as used in this article includes any construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, any school building.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17295.

(a) (1) The Department of General Services shall pass upon and approve or reject all plans for the construction or, if the estimated cost exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), the alteration of any school building.

(2) To enable the Department of General Services to pass upon and approve plans pursuant to this subdivision, the governing board of each school district and any other school authority before adopting any plans for the school building shall submit the plans to the Department of General Services for approval, and shall pay the fees prescribed in this article.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), where the estimated cost of the reconstruction or alteration of, or an addition to, any school building exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), but does not exceed two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000), a licensed structural engineer shall examine the proposed project to determine if it is a nonstructural alteration or a structural alteration. If he or she determines that the project is a nonstructural alteration, he or she shall prepare a statement so indicating. If he or she determines that the project is structural, he or she shall prepare plans and specifications for the project which shall be submitted to the Department of General Services for review and approval. A copy of the engineer’s report stating that the work does not affect structural elements shall be filed with the Department of General Services.

(c) If a licensed structural engineer submits a report to the
 Department of General Services stating that the plans or activities authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) do not involve structural elements, then all of the following shall apply to that project:

(1) The design professional in responsible charge of the project undertaken pursuant to this subdivision shall certify that the plans and specifications for the project meet any applicable fire and life safety standards, and do not affect the disabled access requirements of Section 4450 of the Government Code, and shall submit this certification to the Department of General Services. The letter of certification shall bear the identifying licensing stamp or seal of the design professional. This paragraph does not preclude a design professional from submitting plans and specifications to the Department of General Services along with the appropriate fee for review.

(2) Within 10 days of
 the completion of any project authorized pursuant to subdivision (b), the school construction inspector of record on the project, who is certified by the Department of General Services to inspect school buildings, shall certify in writing to the Department of General Services that the reconstruction, alteration, or addition has been completed in compliance with the plans and specifications.

(3) The dollar amounts cited in this section shall be increased on an annual basis, commencing January 1, 2018, by the Department of General Services according to an inflationary index governing construction costs that is selected and recognized by the Department of General Services.

(4) No school district shall subdivide a project for the purpose of evading the limitation on amounts cited in this section.

(d) For purposes of this
 section, “design professional in responsible charge” or “design professional” means the licensed architect, licensed structural engineer, or licensed civil engineer who is responsible for the completion of the design work involved with the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 19.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17296.

Notwithstanding any other law, a school-based facility providing social services or support services, or health care, that is established through agreements with local governments and school districts pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 8800) of Part 6 or as part of an integrated children’s services program pursuant to Chapter 12.82 (commencing with Section 18986.40) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, respectively, is located on school property, and meets all the requirements of the Uniform Building Code and has been approved by the building department of the appropriate local jurisdiction, as well as those of the appropriate local jurisdiction, shall not be required to obtain approval of plans by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section
 17295.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 28.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

17297.

Except as provided in Section 17298, before letting any contract for any construction or alteration of any school building, the written approval of the plans, as to safety of design and construction, by the Department of General Services, shall be first had and obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17298.

Before the commencement of any fabrication, construction, or alteration of a relocatable school building of a type previously approved by the Department of General Services, the written approval of the plans, as to the safety and design of construction, by the Department of General Services, shall be first had and obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17299.

In each case the application for approval of the plans shall be accompanied by the plans and full, complete, and accurate specifications, and structural design computations, and estimates of cost, which shall comply in every respect with any and all requirements prescribed by the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17300.

(a) The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee in amounts as determined by the Department of General Services based on the estimated cost of the work described in subdivision (a) of Section 17280, according to the following schedule:

(1) For the first one million dollars ($1,000,000), a fee of 1.25 percent of the estimated cost.

(2) For all costs in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000), a fee of 1 percent of the estimated cost.

(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), if, on or after July 1, 2017, the Department of General Services adjusts the fee schedule
 pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17301, the adjusted fee schedule shall be used instead.
